tests/added-n forms - full added-n forms.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "алга = palm":
    алга<n><nom> : алга
    алга<n><acc> : алгыг
    алга<n><gen> : алганы
    алга<n><abl> : алганаас
    алга<n><dat> : алганд
    алга<n><pl><nom> : алганууд

 "нүд = eye":
    нүд<n><nom> : нүд
    нүд<n><acc> : нүдийг
    нүд<n><gen> : нүдний
    нүд<n><abl> : нүднээс
    нүд<n><dat> : нүдэнд
    нүд<n><pl><nom> : нүднүүд

 "мод = tree":
    мод<n><nom> : мод
    мод<n><acc> : модыг
    мод<n><gen> : модны
    мод<n><abl> : модноос
    мод<n><dat> : модонд
    мод<n><pl><nom> : модод

 "үе = joint":
    үе<n><nom> : үе
    үе<n><acc> : үеийг
    үе<n><gen> : үений
    үе<n><abl> : үенээс
    үе<n><dat> : үенд

 "цаг = watch":
    цаг<n><nom> : цаг
    цаг<n><acc> : цагийг
    цаг<n><gen> : цагны
    цаг<n><abl> : цагнаас
    цаг<n><dat> : цаганд
    цаг<n><pl><nom> : цагнууд

 "гөрөөс = ~gazelle":
    гөрөөс<n><nom> : гөрөөс
    гөрөөс<n><acc> : гөрөөсийг
    гөрөөс<n><gen> : гөрөөсний
    гөрөөс<n><abl> : гөрөөснөөс
    гөрөөс<n><dat> : гөрөөсөнд
    гөрөөс<n><pl><nom> : гөрөөснүүд

 "сар = moon":
    сар<n><nom> : сар
    сар<n><acc> : сарыг
    сар<n><gen> : сарны
    сар<n><abl> : сарнаас
    сар<n><dat> : саранд

 "дуу = song":
    дуу<n><nom> : дуу
    дуу<n><acc> : дууг
    дуу<n><gen> : дууны
    дуу<n><abl> : дуунаас
    дуу<n><dat> : дуунд
    дуу<n><pl><nom> : дуунууд

 "тэмээ = camel":
    тэмээ<n><nom> : тэмээ
    тэмээ<n><acc> : тэмээг
    тэмээ<n><gen> : тэмээний
    тэмээ<n><abl> : тэмээнээс
    тэмээ<n><dat> : тэмээнд

 "мах = meat":
    мах<n><nom> : мах
    мах<n><acc> : махыг
    мах<n><gen> : махны
    мах<n><abl> : махнаас
    мах<n><dat> : маханд

 "цай = tea":
    цай<n><nom> : цай
    цай<n><acc> : цайг
    цай<n><gen> : цайны
    цай<n><abl> : цайнаас
    цай<n><dat> : цайнд

 "ширээ = table":
    ширээ<n><nom> : ширээ
    ширээ<n><acc> : ширээг
    ширээ<n><gen> : ширээний
    ширээ<n><abl> : ширээнээс
    ширээ<n><dat> : ширээнд

 "өрөө = room":
    өрөө<n><nom> : өрөө
    өрөө<n><acc> : өрөөг
    өрөө<n><gen> : өрөөний
    өрөө<n><abl> : өрөөнөөс
    өрөө<n><dat> : өрөөнд
